Maine, session 132, LD2013.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 12 MRSA §6171, sub-§6 is enacted to read:
6. Emergency rules to limit taking of marine organisms. Notwithstanding
subsections 3 and 5, the commissioner may adopt routine technical rules as emergency
rules under Title 5, section 8054 that limit the taking of marine organisms by method or
location to protect marine mammals listed under section 6975 when the commissioner,
upon consultation with industry personnel, determines that immediate action is necessary
to mitigate circumstances posing an exceptionally high level of risk to those mammals.
Sec. 2. 12 MRSA §6171, sub-§7 is enacted to read:
7. Annual report on use of emergency rule-making authority. The department
shall submit a written report on or before January 1st of each year to the joint standing
committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over marine resources matters regarding
the use of emergency rulemaking pursuant to subsection 6. The joint standing committee
may report out a bill based on the report to any regular or special session of the Legislature
in the year the report is due.
Page 1 - 132LR2635(03)